Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1418
Tobacco; electronic nicotine delivery systems; alternative nicotine products; use by person under age of twenty-one years; penalty.

Whoever, being a person under the age of twenty-one years, shall smoke cigarettes or cigars, use electronic nicotine delivery systems or alternative nicotine products, or use tobacco in any form whatever, in this state, shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor. Any person charged with a violation of this section may be free from prosecution if he or she furnishes evidence for the conviction of the person or persons selling or giving him or her the cigarettes, cigars, electronic nicotine delivery systems, alternative nicotine products, or tobacco.

Laws 1911, c. 181, §§ 1, 2, 3, p. 561;

R.S.1913, § 8846;

C.S.1922, § 9847;

C.S.1929, § 28-1021;

R.S.1943, § 28-1020;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 103;

R.R.S.1943, § 28-1020, (1975);

Laws 2014, LB863, § 16;

Laws 2019, LB149, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB397, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB1064, § 1.